West Virginia, session 2025, HB2143.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. TRAINING, CERTIFICATION, LICENSING, PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. §18A-3-13. Endorsement in the science of reading for elementary school teachers. Beginning not later than the 2026-2027 school year, each Kindergarten through Grade 5 public school teacher and public charter school teacher providing literacy instruction shall be trained using high quality professional learning that incorporates ongoing, intensive training in the science of reading that includes classroom application activities and live sessions spanning multiple school years as approved and provided through the West Virginia Department of Education. Currently employed educators in Kindergarten through Grade 5 providing literacy instruction in West Virginia shall enroll in the approved professional learning no later than the 2027-2028 school year.  Newly employed teachers providing literacy instruction in Kindergarten through Grade 5 shall enroll in their first year of employment. Educators who have successfully completed the approved training shall submit an application for the Science of Reading endorsement free of charge. The State Board may provide accommodations for those counties whose educators are in the process of obtaining this endorsement. Public charter school teachers may choose to participate in the requirements set forth in this section. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home